North Carolina statutes. Chapter 39. Conveyances.
Article 3A. Uniform Voidable Transactions Act.
§ 39-23.9A.
Governing law.

In this section, the following rules determine a debtor’s location:

A debtor who is an individual is located at the individual’s principal residence.

A debtor that is an organization and has only one place of business is located at its place of business.

A debtor that is an organization and has more than one place of business is located at its chief executive office.

A claim for relief in the nature of a claim for relief under this Article is governed by the local law of the jurisdiction in which the debtor is located when the transfer is made or the obligation is incurred.

History.
2015-23, s. 1.

Official Comment (2014)

Section 10, added in 2014, is a simple and predictable choice of law rule applicable to claims for relief of the nature governed by the Act. It provides that a claim for relief in the nature of a claim for relief under the Act is governed by the local
law of the jurisdiction in which the debtor is “located” at the time the challenged transfer is made or the challenged obligation is incurred. “Local” law means the substantive law of the referenced jurisdiction, and not its choice
of law rules. Section 6 determines the time at which a transfer is made or obligation is incurred for purposes of the Act, including this section. Section 10 applies equally to a candidate jurisdiction that is a sister state and
to a candidate jurisdiction that is a foreign nation.

The choice of law rule set forth in § 10(b) applies to any claim for relief in the nature of a claim for relief under this Act—in other words, any claim for relief sufficiently similar to a claim for relief under this Act as to warrant the application
of this Act’s choice of law rule. “This Act” of course refers to the enactment of this Act that is in force in the jurisdiction whose enactment of § 10(b) is being applied. Section 10(b) could not properly have been written to
apply merely to “a claim for relief under this Act,” for such a formulation would presuppose the applicability of the substantive provisions of this Act as in force in that jurisdiction. If a question should arise as to whether
a given claim for relief is sufficiently similar to a claim for relief under this Act that § 10(b) should apply to it, tAs he answer is left to judicial determination.

As used in subsection (a), the terms “principal residence,” “place of business,” and “chief executive office” are to be evaluated on the basis of authentic and sustained activity, not on the basis of manipulations employed to establish a location artificially
(e.g., by such means as establishing a notional “chief executive office” by use of straw-man officers or directors in a jurisdiction in which creditors’ rights are substantially debased, or establishing a notional “principal residence”
for a short term in such a jurisdiction for the purpose of making an asset transfer while there). Notwithstanding the adaptation of subsection (a) from U.C.C. § 9-307(b) (2014), the foregoing terms need not necessarily have the
same meanings in both statutes. Debtors are likely to have greater incentive and ability to employ “asset tourism” for the purpose of seeking to evade the substantive rules of this Act than for the purpose of seeking to manipulate
the perfection and priority rules of secured transactions law. Interpretation and application of this Act should so recognize.

“Location” under this Act is completely independent from the concept of “center of main interests” (“COMI”), as that term is used in Chapter 15 of the Bankruptcy Code. Chapter 15, which applies to transnational insolvency proceedings, requires United
States courts to defer in various ways to a foreign proceeding in the jurisdiction of the debtor’s COMI. Those consequences are quite different from the consequences of “location” under this Act. Furthermore, if the debtor is an
organization, the debtor’s jurisdiction of organization has no bearing on the debtor’s “location” under subsection (a), by contrast to the presumption in Bankruptcy Code § 1516(c) (2014) that the jurisdiction in which the debtor
has its registered office (i.e., its jurisdiction of organization) is its COMI.

Section 10(b) determines the governing law only for a claim for relief in the nature of a claim for relief under this Act. Furthermore, this Act, like the earlier Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act, has never purported to be an exclusive law on the subject
of voidable transfers and obligations. See Comment 2 to § 15. Accordingly, the choice of law rule set forth in this § 10 is by no means applicable to all assertions that a transfer was made or an obligation incurred in contravention
of law.

Basing choice of law on the location of the debtor is analogous to the rule set forth in U.C.C. § 9-301 (2014), which provides that the priority of a security interest in intangible property is generally governed by the local law of the jurisdiction in
which the debtor is located. The analogy is apt, because the substantive rules of this Act are a species of priority rule, in that they determine the circumstances in which a debtor’s creditors, rather than the debtor’s transferee,
have superior rights in property transferred by the debtor. In keeping with that analogy, the definition of the debtor’s “location” in subsection (a) is identical to the baseline definition of that term in U.C.C. § 9-307(b) (2014).
Subsection (a) does not include any of the exceptions to the baseline definition that are set forth in Article 9 of the Uniform Commercial Code, such as U.C.C. § 9-307(e) (2014) (providing that the location of a domestic corporation
or other “registered organization” is its jurisdiction of organization), and U.C.C. § 9-307(c) (2014) (providing in effect that if the baseline definition would locate a debtor in a jurisdiction that lacks an Article 9-style filing
system, then the debtor is instead located in the District of Columbia). Those exceptions are not included in subsection (a) because their primary purpose relates to the operation of Article 9’s perfection rules, which have no analogue
in this Act.

For example, suppose that the principal residence of Spouse X is State A and the principal residence of Spouse Y is State B. Spouse Y, anticipating a future divorce, transfers assets to Transferee for the purpose of thwarting X’s economic interests in
the divorce. Later a divorce action between X and Y is properly brought in the courts of State A, which has enacted this Act. Law other than this Act (presumably the family law of State A) will govern such matters as the classification
of the transferred property as marital or separate and the remedies available against Y for wrongful dissipation of assets, such as awarding a larger share of marital property to X or imposing a lien on the separate property of Y.
The choice of law rule set forth in § 10 does not apply to those matters, for they do not involve a claim for relief in the nature of a claim for relief under this Act. However, if Transferee is subject to personal jurisdiction in
State A and X brings an action in State A against Transferee seeking avoidance of the transfer, or a money judgment against Transferee in lieu of avoidance, on the ground that the transfer had been made by Y with intent to hinder,
delay, or defraud X, the choice of law rule set forth in § 10 would apply to that action, and as a result that action would be governed by the voidable transfer law of State B.

§ 39-23.9B.
Application to series organization.

In this section, the following definitions apply:

Protected series. — An arrangement, however denominated, created by a series organization that, pursuant to the law under which the series organization is organized, has the characteristics set forth in subdivision (2) of this subsection.

Series organization. — An organization that, pursuant to the law under which it is organized, has all the following characteristics:

The organic record of the organization provides for creation by the organization of one or more protected series, however denominated, with respect to specified property of the organization, and for records to be maintained for each protected series that
identify the property of or associated with the protected series.

Debt incurred or existing with respect to the activities of, or property of or associated with, a particular protected series is enforceable against the property of or associated with the protected series only, and not against the property of or associated
with the organization or other protected series of the organization.

Debt incurred or existing with respect to the activities or property of the organization is enforceable against the property of the organization only, and not against the property of or associated with a protected series of the organization.

A series organization and each protected series of the organization is a separate person for purposes of this Article, even if for other purposes a protected series is not a person separate from the organization or other protected series of the organization.

History.
2015-23, s. 1.

Official Comment (2014)

This section, added in 2014, accommodates developments in business organization statutes exemplified by the Uniform Statutory Trust Entity Act §§ 401-404 (2009) and Del. Code Ann. tit. 6, § 18-215 (2012) (pertaining to Delaware limited liability companies).
The definition of “series organization” in subsection (a)(2) is adapted from §§ 401-402 of the Uniform Statutory Trust Entity Act. If the statute under which an organization is organized permits it to divide its assets and debts among
“protected series” (however denominated), such that assets and debts of, or associated with, each “protected series” are separated in accordance with subsections (a)(2)(ii) and (iii), and if the organization does so, then the provisions
of this Act apply to each “protected series” as if it were a legal entity, regardless of whether it is considered to be a legal entity for other purposes. The conditions referred to in subsections (a)(2)(ii) and (iii) are satisfied
if the law under which the organization is organized so provides. It does not matter whether the separation of assets and debts described in subsections (a)(2)(ii) and (iii) would be respected by another jurisdiction in which the organization
does business, or would be given effect by the Bankruptcy Code in the bankruptcy of the organization. An organization may be a “series organization” having “protected series,” as those terms are used in this section, even though the
statute under which the organization is organized uses different terminology. This section uses the term “protected series,” which is not used in either the Uniform Statutory Trust Entity Act or the Delaware provisions cited above,
to emphasize that the application of this section does not depend upon the terminology used by the applicable statute.

The addition of this section to the Act does not imply any judgment about the desirability of legislation enabling the creation of protected series.

§ 39-23.10.
Supplementary provisions.

Unless displaced by the provisions of this Article, the principles of law and equity, including the law merchant and the law relating to principal and agent, estoppel, laches, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, insolvency, or other validating
or invalidating cause, supplement its provisions.

History.
1997-291, s. 2.

Official Comment (2014)

This section is derived from § 11 of the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act and Uniform Commercial Code § 1-103 (1984) (later § 1-103(b) (2014)). The section adds a reference to “laches” in recognition of the particular appropriateness of the application
of this equitable doctrine to an untimely action to avoid a transfer under this Act. See Louis Dreyfus Corp. v. Butler , 496 F.2d 806, 808 (6th Cir. 1974) (action to avoid transfers to debtor’s wife when debtor was engaged in speculative
business held to be barred by laches or applicable statutes of limitations);

Cooch v. Grier
, 30 Del.Ch. 255, 265-66, 59 A.2d 282, 287-88 (1948) (action under the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act held barred by laches when the creditor was chargeable with inexcusable delay and the defendant was prejudiced by the
delay).

§ 39-23.11.
Uniformity of application and construction.

This Article shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this Article among states enacting it.

History.
1997-291, s. 2; 2015-23, s. 1.

§ 39-23.11A.
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This Article modifies, limits, or supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001(c), or authorize electronic
delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7003(b).

History.
2015-23, s. 1.

§ 39-23.12.
Short title.

This Article, which was formerly cited as the Uniform Fraudulent Transfer Act, may be cited as the Uniform Voidable Transactions Act.

History.
1997-291, s. 2; 2015-23, s. 1.

Official Comment (2014)

The 2014 amendments change the short title of the Act from “Uniform Fraudulent Transfer Act” to “Uniform Voidable Transactions Act.” The change of title is not intended to effect any change in the meaning of the Act. The retitling is not motivated by
the substantive revisions made by the 2014 amendments, which are relatively minor. Rather, the word “Fraudulent” in the original title, though sanctioned by historical usage, was a misleading description of the Act as it was originally
written. Fraud is not, and never has been, a necessary element of a claim for relief under the Act. The misleading intimation to the contrary in the original title of the Act led to confusion in the courts. See, e.g., § 4, Comment
10. The misleading insistence on “fraud” in the original title also contributed to the evolution of widely-used shorthand terminology that further tends to distort understanding of the provisions of the Act. Thus, several theories
of recovery under the Act that have nothing whatever to do with fraud (or with intent of any sort) came to be widely known by the oxymoronic and confusing shorthand tag “constructive fraud.” See §§ 4(a)(2), 5(a). Likewise, the
primordial theory of recovery under the Act, set forth in § 4(a)(1), came to be widely known by the shorthand tag “actual fraud.” That shorthand is misleading, because that provision does not in fact require proof of fraudulent
intent. See § 4, Comment 8.

The Act, like the earlier Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act, has never purported to be an exclusive law on the subject of voidable transfers and obligations. See Prefatory Note (1984), ¶ 5; § 1, Comment 2, ¶ 6; § 4, Comment 9, ¶ 1; § 10, Comment 5. It
remains the case that the Act is not the exclusive law on the subject of voidable transfers and obligations.

The retitling of the Act should not be construed to affect references to the Act in other statutes or international instruments that use the former terminology. See, e.g., Convention on International Interests in Mobile Equipment, art. 30(a)(3), opened
for signature Nov. 16, 2001, S. Treaty Doc. No. 108-10 (referring to “any rules of law applicable in insolvency proceedings relating to the avoidance of a transaction as a … transfer in fraud of creditors”).

The 2014 amendments also make a correction to the text of the Act that is consonant with the change of the Act’s title. As originally written, the Act inconsistently used different words to denote a transfer or obligation for which the Act provides a
remedy: sometimes “voidable” (see original § 2(d), §§ 8(a), (d), (e), (f)), and sometimes “fraudulent” (see original § 4(a), §§ 5(a), (b), § 9). The amendments resolve that inconsistency by using “voidable” consistently or deleting
the word as unnecessary. No change in meaning is intended.

The Act does not address the extent to which a person who facilitates the making of a transfer or the incurrence of an obligation that is voidable under the Act may be subject to liability for that reason, whether under a theory of aiding and abetting,
civil conspiracy, or otherwise. The Act leaves that subject to supplementary principles of law. See § 12. Cf. § 8(b)(1)(i) (imposing liability upon, inter alia, “the person for whose benefit the transfer was made”). Other law also
governs such matters as (i) the circumstances in which a lawyer who assists a debtor in making a transfer or incurring an obligation that is voidable under the Act violates rules of professional conduct applicable to lawyers, (ii)
the circumstances in which communications between the debtor and the lawyer in respect of such a transfer or obligation are excepted from attorney-client privilege, and (iii) the extent to which criminal sanctions apply to a debtor,
transferee, obligee, or person who facilitates the making of a transfer or the incurrence of an obligation that is voidable under the Act. Neither the retitling of the Act, nor the consistent use of “voidable” in its text per Comment
4, effects any change in the meaning of the Act, and those amendments should not be construed to affect any of the foregoing matters.

In addition, the word “Transfer” in the original title of the Act was underinclusive, because the Act applies to incurrence of obligations as well as to transfers of property.

Cross References.

As to arrest and bail in action for fraud on creditors, see

G.S. 1-410

, subdivision (5).

As to attachment in action for fraud, see

G.S. 1-440.1

et seq.

As to preferences in deeds of trust or deeds of assignment for benefit of creditors, see

G.S. 23-1

et seq.

As to registration of conveyances, contracts to convey, and leases of land, see

G.S. 47-18

.

As to registration, see the Connor Act, see

G.S. 47-17

et seq.

As to statutes concerning married persons generally, see

G.S. 52-1

et seq.